Missouri, session 2026, HB3465.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.141, to read as follows:
1.141. If any provision of a legislative act is found unconstitutional by a court of
competent jurisdiction for any reason, whether procedural or substantive, the provision
shall be severed, the remaining provisions shall be valid, and the court shall presume
that the general assembly would have enacted the valid provisions without the void one,
provided that if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the general
assembly would not have enacted the valid provisions absent the void provision, then the
valid provisions shall also be declared invalid. Clear and convincing evidence shall
include, but not be limited to, a finding that the valid provisions, standing alone, are
incomplete and are incapable of being executed in accordance with the legislative intent.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.